Missouri, session 2026, SB1580.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 195.070, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 195.070,
to read as follows:
195.070. 1. A physician, podiatrist, dentist, a
registered optometrist certified to administer
pharmaceutical agents as provided in section 336.220, or an
assistant physician in accordance with section 334.037 or a
physician assistant in accordance with section 334.747 in
good faith and in the course of his or her professional
practice only, may prescribe, administer, and dispense
controlled substances or he or she may cause the same to be
administered or dispensed by an individual as authorized by
statute.
2. An advanced practice registered nurse, as defined
in section 335.016, but not a certified registered nurse
anesthetist as defined in subdivision (8) of section
335.016, who holds a certificate of controlled substance
prescriptive authority from the board of nursing under
section 335.019 and who is delegated the authority to
prescribe controlled substances under a collaborative

SB 1580 2
practice arrangement under section 334.104 may prescribe any
controlled substances listed in Schedules III, IV, and V of
section 195.017, and may have restricted authority in
Schedule II. Prescriptions for Schedule II medications
prescribed by an advanced practice registered nurse who has
a certificate of controlled substance prescriptive authority
are restricted to only those medications containing
hydrocodone and Schedule II controlled substances for
hospice patients pursuant to the provisions of section
334.104. However, no such certified advanced practice
registered nurse shall prescribe controlled substance for
his or her own self or family. Schedule III narcotic
controlled substance and Schedule II - hydrocodone
prescriptions shall be limited to a one hundred twenty-hour
supply without refill.
3. A veterinarian, in good faith and in the course of
the veterinarian's professional practice only, and not for
use by a human being, may prescribe, administer, and
dispense controlled substances and the veterinarian may
cause them to be administered by an assistant or orderly
under his or her direction and supervision.
4. A practitioner shall not accept any portion of a
controlled substance unused by a patient, for any reason, if
such practitioner did not originally dispense the drug,
except:
(1) When the controlled substance is delivered to the
practitioner to administer to the patient for whom the
medication is prescribed as authorized by federal law.
Practitioners shall maintain records and secure the
medication as required by this chapter and regulations
promulgated pursuant to this chapter; or
(2) As provided in section 195.265.

SB 1580 3
5. An individual practitioner shall not prescribe or
dispense a controlled substance for such practitioner's
personal use except in a medical emergency.
6. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary:
(1) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 334 shall
not delegate to any other individual the authority to order
ketamine hydrochloride for mental health purposes under the
physician's registration with the federal Drug Enforcement
Administration and the state bureau of narcotics and
dangerous drugs;
(2) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 334 who
delegates the administration of ketamine hydrochloride for
mental health purposes to a certified registered nurse
anesthetist shall be on site and immediately available to
supervise and respond to patient needs during such
administration; and
(3) Intravenous ketamine hydrochloride treatment for
mental health purposes shall not be administered without a
documented diagnosis and treatment plan from a physician
licensed under chapter 334.
✓